Washington statutes.
RCW 7.69.050

Construction of chapter—Other remedies or defenses.

Nothing contained in this chapter may be construed to provide grounds for error in favor of a criminal defendant in a criminal proceeding, nor may anything in this chapter be construed to grant a new cause of action or remedy against the state, its political subdivisions, law enforcement agencies, or prosecuting attorneys. The failure of a person to make a reasonable effort to ensure that victims, survivors, and witnesses under this chapter have the rights enumerated in RCW 7.69.030 shall not result in civil liability against that person. This chapter does not limit other civil remedies or defenses of the offender or the victim or survivors of the victim.

[ 1985 c 443 s 5.]

NOTES:

Severability—Effective date—1985 c 443: See notes following RCW 7.69.010.